California statutes. Education Code
(3) Any state employee of a state employer under the uniform state payroll system, excluding the California State University System, eligible to participate in an annuity contract and custodial account as described in Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

(b) The following criteria shall apply to that annuity contract and custodial account:

(1) The annuity contract and custodial account shall be offered for at least five years.

(2) The annuity contract and custodial account may be administered by a qualified third-party administrator that shall, under agreement with the system, provide custodial, investment, recordkeeping, or administrative services, or any combination thereof. The third-party administrator may not provide investment options other than pursuant to a shareholders’ services agreement between the third-party administrator and the investment manager.

(3) The investment options offered shall be determined by the board consistent with those annuity contract and custodial accounts described in Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

(4) The system’s investment staff shall make recommendations to the board as to the appropriate investment options. At a minimum, the board shall offer at least three investment options. The board shall have sole responsibility for the selection of service providers.

(5) All contributions made in accordance with the provisions of Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and this section shall be remitted directly to the administrator and held by the administrator in a custodial account on behalf of the employee. Any investment gains or losses shall be credited to those accounts. The forms of payment and disbursement procedure shall be consistent with those generally offered by similar annuity contracts and custodial accounts and applicable federal and state statutes governing those contracts and accounts.

(6) Any employer, other than the state, may elect to make contributions to the employee’s annuity contract and custodial account on behalf of the employee. The employer shall take whatever action is necessary to implement this section, including the adoption of an annuity contract and custodial account, or provide the appropriate authorization in accordance with the provision of Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. Employer contributions made under this section are excluded from the definition of creditable compensation as provided in Section 22119.2.

(7) The design and administration of the annuity contract and custodial account shall comply with the applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and the Revenue and Taxation Code. Section 770.3 of the Insurance Code shall not be applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 230, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

24950.5.

(a) The system may administer an individual retirement plan as described in Section 408A of Title 26 of the United States Code for the purpose of accepting a rollover from an annuity contract or custodial account offered by the system pursuant to this chapter to the extent the rollover complies with Title 26 of the United States Code.

(b) The system may provide for the administration of the individual retirement plan described in subdivision (a) by a qualified third-party administrator who shall, by agreement with the system, provide custodial, investment, recordkeeping, or administrative services, or any combination thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 432, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

24951.

If the rate of participation in the annuity contract and custodial account is less than 2 percent of active members in the Defined Benefit Program upon the completion of the initial five years of administration, the board may elect to terminate the offering of the annuity contract and custodial account as described in Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. The board shall provide two years’ notice to the annuity contract and custodial account participants of its intention to terminate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 227.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

24952.

(a) Any annuity contract and custodial account advertised, promoted, or offered through one or more third-party service providers, shall provide for recovery, from the employees who participate, of all costs and expenses of its own administration, including, but not limited to, advertising, promotion, legal, accounting, compliance, recordkeeping, and investment costs and expenses.

(b) Any annuity contract and custodial account administered by the system shall provide for the recovery of all costs and expenses of its administration.

(c) The system may promote and advertise an annuity contract and custodial account administered directly by the system or by a third-party administrator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 780, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

24953.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Annuity contract” means an annuity contract described in Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code that is available to employees as described in Section 770.3 of the Insurance Code.

(2) “Custodial account” means a custodial account described in Section 403(b)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) “Third-party administrator” means a person or entity other than the system that provides administrative or compliance services to the system as described in subdivision (b).

(b) An employer that employs persons to perform creditable service subject to coverage by the plan under this part, or the Controller on behalf of any state employer under the uniform state payroll system, excluding the California State University System, that employs persons eligible to participate in an annuity contract or custodial account as described in Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, may enter into a written contract with the system for services regarding an annuity contract and custodial account provided by the employer. That contract may include any of the following:

(1) Services to ensure compliance with Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code regarding the annuity contract and custodial account including, but not limited to, services that permit the system to do any of the following:

(A) Administer and maintain written plan documents governing the employer’s plan.

(B) Review and authorize hardship withdrawal requests, transfer requests, loan requests and other disbursements permitted under Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(C) Review and determine domestic relations orders as qualified domestic relations orders as described in Section 414(p) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(D) Provide notice to eligible employees that is consistent with Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations that those employees may participate in an annuity contract and custodial account.

(E) Administer and maintain specimen salary reduction agreements for the employer and employees of that employer to initiate payroll deferrals.

(F) Monitor, from information provided either directly from the employee, as part of the common remitting services provided pursuant to paragraph (2), through information provided by the employer, or through information provided by vendors authorized by the employer to provide investment products, the maximum contributions allowed by employees participating in the annuity contract and custodial account as described in Sections 402(g), 414(v), and 415 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(G) Calculate and maintain vesting information for contributions made by the employer to the annuity contract and custodial account.

(H) Identify and notify employees that are required to take a minimum distribution of the funds in that employee’s annuity contract and custodial account as described in Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(I) Coordinate responses to the Internal Revenue Service if there is an Internal Revenue Service audit of the annuity contract and custodial account.

(2) Services to administer the annuity contract and custodial account that include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Common remitting services.

(B) General educational information to employees about the annuity contract and custodial account that includes, but is not limited to, the enrollment process, program eligibility, and investment options.

(C) Internal reports for the employer to ensure compliance with Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code and Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(D) Consulting services related to the design, operation, and administration of the plan.

(E) Internal audits, on behalf of an employer, of a provider’s plan compliance procedures with respect to the provider’s annuity contract and custodial account offered under the employer’s plan. These audits shall not be conducted more than once per year for a provider’s plan, unless documented evidence indicates a problem in complying with Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) If the system elects to contract with a third-party administrator for the administrative or compliance services to employers described in subdivision (b), the system shall do all of the following:

(1) Determine that hiring the third-party administrator is in the best interest of the participants to the annuity contract and custodial account, their beneficiaries, and the employer that provides that annuity contract and custodial account.

(2) Require the third-party administrator to provide proof of liability insurance and a fidelity bond in an amount determined by the system to be sufficient to protect the assets of participants and beneficiaries in the annuity contract and custodial account.

(3) Require evidence, if the third-party administrator is related to or affiliated with a provider of investment products pursuant to Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, that data generated from the services provided by the third-party administrator are maintained in a manner that prevents the provider of investment products from accessing that data.

(d) Any personal information obtained by the system in providing services pursuant to this section shall be used by the system only to provide those services for the employer in accordance with the contract entered into with the employer pursuant to subdivision (b).

(e) Nothing in this section requires an employer to contract with the system for the administrative or compliance services described in subdivision (b). A written contract for the administrative or compliance services described in subdivision (b) shall be on behalf of and at the request of the employer.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to interfere with either:

(1) The rights of employees or beneficiaries as described in Section 770.3 of the Insurance Code.

(2) The ability of an employer to establish nonarbitrary requirements upon providers of an annuity contract that, in the employer’s determination, aid in the administration of its benefit programs and do not unreasonably discriminate against any provider of an annuity contract or interfere with the rights of employees or beneficiaries as described in Section 770.3 of the Insurance Code.

(g) The cost of providing administrative or compliance services pursuant to this section shall be deemed to be a cost incurred by the employer and subject to subdivision (b) of Section 44041 or subdivision (b) of Section 87040, as may be applicable.

(h) In any conflict between this section and Section 44041.5 or 87040.5, including, with respect to the provision of services provided pursuant to a contract between an employer and the system, the provisions of this section shall prevail.

(i) The system shall disclose to an employer seeking the services described in this section any fees, commissions, cost offsets, reimbursements, or marketing or promotional items received by the system or a third-party administrator from any plan provider selected as a vendor of an annuity contract or custodial account by the employer. If the system or a third-party administrator is affiliated with or has a contractual relationship with a provider of annuity contracts or custodial accounts, the system or third-party administrator shall disclose the existence of that relationship to each employer and employee participating in the annuity contract or custodial account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 230, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 37. Deferred Compensation Plans [24975. - 24977.]

24975.

(a) The board may develop one or more deferred compensation plans under Section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code that an employer may choose to establish and offer to its employees who are members or participants of the plan under this part or Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000) or any employee of a local public agency or political subdivision of this state that employs persons to perform creditable service subject to coverage by the plan under this part.

(b) If an employer adopts a deferred compensation plan described in subdivision (a):

(1) The employer shall enter into a written contractual arrangement with the
 system under which the system, or a third-party administrator acting on behalf of the system, shall provide investment, recordkeeping, and administrative services for the deferred compensation plan.

(2) The deferred compensation plan shall continue to constitute a separate plan established and maintained by the adopting employer.

(3) The system shall be treated as acting on behalf of the employer in administering the deferred compensation plan.

(4) The terms and administration of the deferred compensation plan shall be in accordance with the applicable provisions of Section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(5) In administering the deferred compensation plan on behalf of the employer, the board shall have the same investment authority and discretion and
 be subject to the same fiduciary standards pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 22250), with respect to amounts deferred under the deferred compensation plan as applied by the system with respect to the Teachers’ Retirement Fund.

(c) If an employer establishes and maintains a deferred compensation plan described in subdivision (a), the deferred compensation plan shall be offered to all of its employees who are eligible to participate pursuant to this section.

(d) An employee participating in a deferred compensation plan established by an employer under this section shall enter into a written agreement with the employer for the deferral of compensation prior to the performance of the services to which that compensation relates.

(e) If an employer chooses to establish and maintain a deferred compensation plan
 described in subdivision (a) that is to be administered by the system, the employer shall take all necessary or appropriate action to implement this section in cooperation with the system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 558, Sec. 47.   (AB 1379)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

24976.

(a) (1) The Teachers’ Deferred Compensation Fund is hereby established to serve as the repository of funds received by the system pursuant to this chapter, Chapter 36 (commencing with Section 24950) or Chapter 39 (commencing with Section 25100).

(2) Except as described in paragraph (7), premium and fee revenues received by the system pursuant to Chapter 36 (commencing with Section 24950), except Section 24950.5, shall be deposited into the 403(b) Services Operating Account within the Teachers’ Deferred Compensation Fund, and shall only be used to carry out the purposes of that chapter, excluding Section 24950.5.

(3) Premium and fee revenues received by the system pursuant to Section 24950.5 of Chapter 36 shall be deposited into the Roth IRA Operating Account within the Teachers’ Deferred Compensation Fund, and shall only be used to carry out the purposes of that section.

(4) Premium and fee revenues received by the system pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited into the Deferred Compensation Services Operating Account within the Teachers’ Deferred Compensation Fund, and shall only be used to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(5) Compensation deferrals received by the system pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited into the Deferred Compensation Investment Account within the Teachers’ Deferred Compensation Fund, and shall only be used to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(6) Fee revenues received by the system pursuant to Chapter 39 (commencing with Section 25100) shall be deposited into the 403(b) Vendor Registry Operating Account within the Teachers’ Deferred Compensation Fund, and shall only be used to carry out the purposes of that chapter.

(7) Fee revenues received by the system pursuant to Sections 24953 and 24977, and any assets in the Teachers’ Retirement Program Development Fund pursuant to Section 22307.5 as of January 1, 2008, shall be deposited into the Deferred Compensation Administrative and Compliance Services Operating Account within the Teachers’ Deferred Compensation Fund, and shall only be used to carry out the purposes of Sections 24953 and 24977.

(8) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the Teachers’ Deferred Compensation Fund shall be continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal year to carry out the purposes of this chapter, Chapter 36 (commencing with Section 24950), and Chapter 39 (commencing with Section 25100).

(b) With respect to deferred compensation plans administered pursuant to this chapter, and notwithstanding any other provision of law, the system may retain a bank or trust company, or a credit union, to serve as custodian of the moneys of the Teachers’ Deferred Compensation Fund and to provide for safekeeping, recordkeeping, delivery, securities valuation, or investment performance reporting services, or services in connection with investment of the Teachers’ Deferred Compensation Fund.

(c) With respect to deferred compensation plans administered pursuant to this chapter, the Teachers’ Deferred Compensation Fund shall consist of the following sources and receipts, and disbursements shall be accounted for as set forth below:

(1) Premiums determined by the system and paid by participating employers and employees for the cost of administering the deferred compensation plan.

(2) Asset management fees as determined by the system assessed against investment earnings of investment option or of other investment funds. These fees shall be disclosed to employees participating in the deferred compensation plan.

(3) Compensation deferrals to be paid in monthly installments by employers sponsoring deferred compensation plans described in Section 24975 for investment by the system. The moneys shall be deposited in the investment corpus account within the Teachers’ Deferred Compensation Fund and invested in accordance with the investment options selected by the participating employee.

(4) Disbursements to participating employees shall be paid from a disbursement account within the Teachers’ Deferred Compensation Fund in accordance with applicable federal law pertaining to deferred compensation plans.

(5) Income, of whatever nature, earned on the Teachers’ Deferred Compensation Fund shall be credited to the appropriate account. The accounts of participating employees of the employer shall be individually posted to reflect amounts of compensation deferred and investment gains and losses. A periodic statement shall be given to each participating employee.

(6) The system shall have exclusive control of the administration and investment of the Teachers’ Deferred Compensation Fund.

(7) All of the system’s costs of administering the deferred compensation plans pursuant to this chapter shall be recovered from the employees who participate in the plans or assets of the Teachers’ Deferred Compensation Fund in a manner acceptable to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 432, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

24977.

(a) An employer that employs persons to perform creditable service subject to coverage by the plan under this part that offers a deferred compensation plan as described in Section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code may enter into a written contract with the system for services regarding that deferred compensation plan provided by the employer. That contract may include any of the following services:

(1) Services to ensure compliance with Section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code regarding the deferred compensation plan including, but not limited to, services that permit the system to do any of the following:

(A) Administer and maintain written plan documents governing the employer’s plan.

(B) Review and authorize requests for unforeseeable emergency withdrawals, transfer requests, loan requests and other disbursements permitted under Section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(C) Review and determine domestic relations orders as qualified domestic relations orders as described in Section 414(p) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(D) Provide notice to eligible employees that is consistent with Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations that those employees may participate in the deferred compensation plan.

(E) Administer and maintain specimen salary reduction agreements for the employer and employees of that employer to initiate payroll deferrals.

(F) Monitor, from information provided either directly from the employee, as part of the common remitting services provided pursuant to paragraph (2), through information provided by the employer, or through information provided by vendors authorized by the employer to provide investment products, the maximum contributions allowed by employees participating in the deferred compensation plan as described in Sections 414(v) and 457 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(G) Calculate and maintain vesting information for contributions made by the employer to the deferred compensation plan.

(H) Identify and notify employees that are required to take a minimum distribution of the funds in that employee’s deferred compensation plan as described in Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(I) Coordinate responses to the Internal Revenue Service if there is an Internal Revenue Service audit of the deferred compensation plan.

(2) Services to administer the deferred compensation plan that include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Common remitting services.

(B) General educational information to employees about the deferred compensation plan that includes, but is not limited to, the enrollment process, program eligibility, and investment options.

(C) Internal reports for the employer to ensure compliance with Section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code and Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(D) Consulting services related to the design, operation, and administration of the plan.

(E) Internal audits, on behalf of an employer, of a provider’s plan compliance procedures with respect to the provider’s custodial account offered under the employer’s plan. These audits shall not be conducted more than once per year for any provider’s plan unless documented evidence indicates a problem in complying with Section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) The system may contract with a third-party administrator for the administrative and compliance services to employers described in subdivision (a). For purposes of this subdivision, a “third-party administrator” shall mean a person or entity other than the system that provides administrative or compliance services as described in subdivision (a). If the system contracts with a third-party administrator, the system shall do all of the following:

(1) Determine that hiring a third-party administrator is in the best interest of the participants to the deferred compensation plan, their beneficiaries, and the employer that provides that deferred compensation plan.

(2) Require the third-party administrator to provide proof of liability insurance and a fidelity bond in an amount determined by the system to be sufficient to protect the assets of participants and beneficiaries in the deferred compensation plan.

(3) Require evidence, if the third-party administrator is related to or affiliated with a provider of investment products pursuant to Section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code, that data generated from the services provided by the third-party administrator are maintained in a manner that prevents the provider of investment products from accessing that data.

(c) Nothing in this section requires an employer to contract with the system for the administrative or compliance services described in subdivision (a). A written contract for the administrative or compliance services described in subdivision (a) shall be on behalf of and at the request of the employer.

(d) Any personal information obtained by the system in providing services pursuant to this section shall be used by the system only to provide those services for the employer in accordance with the contract entered into with the employer pursuant to subdivision (b).

(e) The cost of providing administrative or compliance services pursuant to this section shall be deemed to be a cost incurred by the employer and subject to subdivision (b) of Section 44041 or subdivision (b) of Section 87040.

(f) In any conflict between this section and Section 44041.5 or 87040.5, including with respect to the provision of services provided pursuant to a contract between an employer and the system, the provisions of this section shall prevail.

(g) The system shall disclose to an employer seeking the services described in this section any fees, commissions, cost offsets, reimbursements, or marketing or promotional items received by the system or a third-party administrator from any plan provider selected as a vendor of a deferred compensation plan by the employer. If the system or a third-party administrator is affiliated with or has a contractual relationship with a provider of deferred compensation plans, the system or third-party administrator shall disclose the existence of that relationship to each employer and each individual participant in the deferred compensation plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 780, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 38. Defined Benefit Supplement Program [25000. - 25025.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [25000. - 25000.9.]

25000.

The Defined Benefit Supplement Program is hereby established to provide supplemental benefits for members of the Defined Benefit Program. The Teachers’ Retirement Board shall administer the Defined Benefit Supplement Program in accordance with the provisions of this part.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1021, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25000.5.

The design and administration of the Defined Benefit Supplement Program shall comply with the applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code and the Revenue and Taxation Code. The board may amend the plan with respect to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program to do any of the following:

(a) Comply with applicable federal law and regulations to the extent permitted by law.

(b) Adopt or amend actuarial assumptions.

(c) Designate the initial plan year.

(d) Declare the annual the minimum interest rate.

(e) Declare an additional earnings credit.

(f) Declare an additional annuity credit.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1021, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25000.7.

(a) A member shall have a vested right to a benefit under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program in an amount equal to the balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account. That right shall accrue when the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account is established pursuant to Section 25004.

(b) If a person becomes entitled to a distribution from the program under this part that constitutes an eligible rollover distribution within the meaning of Section 401(a)(31) of Title 26 of the United States Code, the person may elect, under terms and conditions established by the board, to have the distribution or a portion thereof paid directly to a plan that constitutes an eligible retirement plan within the meaning of Section 401(a)(31), as specified by that person. Upon the exercise of the election by a person with respect to a distribution or a portion thereof, the distribution from the program of the amount so designated, once distributable under the terms of the program, shall be made in the form of a direct rollover to the eligible retirement plan so specified.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 69.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25000.9.

(a) For purposes of this chapter and Section 23300, “nonmember spouse” means a member’s spouse or former spouse who is being or has been awarded a community property interest in the service credit, accumulated retirement contributions, accumulated Defined Benefit Supplement account balance, or benefits of the member under this part.

(b) For purposes of this chapter and Section 23300, a member’s registered domestic partner or former registered domestic partner who is being or has been awarded a community property interest in the service credit, accumulated retirement contributions, accumulated Defined Benefit Supplement account balance, or benefits of the member under this part shall be treated in the same manner as a nonmember spouse.

(c) A nonmember spouse may not be considered a member based upon his or her receipt of any of the following being awarded to the nonmember spouse as a result of legal separation, dissolution of marriage, or dissolution of domestic partnership:

(1) A separate account of service credit and accumulated retirement contributions, a retirement allowance, or an interest in the member’s retirement allowance under the Defined Benefit Program.

(2) A separate account based on the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account balance, a retirement benefit, or an interest in the member’s retirement benefit under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 418, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Program Accounts [25001. - 25008.5.]

25001.

(a) The board shall establish a segregated account within the retirement fund to be known as the Gain and Loss Reserve, and the board shall have sole authority over the reserve. The Gain and Loss Reserve shall be maintained for the Defined Benefit Supplement Program and may be used to credit interest at the minimum interest rate for plan years in which the board determines that the obligation cannot be met from investment earnings. The Gain and Loss Reserve may also be used to provide additions to the Annuitant Reserve for monthly annuities payable under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program.

(b) The board shall establish a goal for the balance of the Gain and Loss Reserve and
 periodically shall review the sufficiency of the reserve based on the recommendations of the actuary.

(c) The board may allocate excess earnings of the plan with respect to assets attributable to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program to the Gain and Loss Reserve. In addition, the board may allocate any liability gains and losses attributable to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program to the Gain and Loss Reserve. Upon the recommendation of the actuary, the board shall determine annually the amount, if any, that is to be allocated to the Gain and Loss Reserve for that plan year. That determination shall be made upon recommendation of the actuary based on the actuarial valuation undertaken following the plan year pursuant to Section 22311.5, but no later than June 30 following the end of the plan year. In determining whether to allocate excess earnings to the Gain and Loss Reserve, the board shall consider all of the following:

(1) Whether or not the plan has excess earnings attributable to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program.

(2) The sufficiency of the Gain and Loss Reserve in light of the goal established pursuant to subdivision (b).

(3) The amount required for the plan’s administrative costs with respect to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program.

(4) The amount required for crediting members’ accounts at the minimum interest rate.

(d) In determining whether to allocate liability gains and losses to the Gain and Loss Reserve, the board shall consider the matters described in paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 218, Sec. 38.   (SB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

25002.

The board shall establish and maintain a segregated account within the retirement fund to be known as the Annuitant Reserve and the board shall have sole authority over the reserve. The Annuitant Reserve shall be used for the payment of annuities under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program. The board shall transfer the balance of credits in a member’s accumulated Defined Benefit Supplement account to the reserve when a benefit is to be paid as an annuity.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1021, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25003.

The board may transfer amounts between the Gain and Loss Reserve and the Annuitant Reserve upon the recommendation of the actuary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 69.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25004.

Member accounts under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program shall be nominal accounts. Member contributions and employer contributions on behalf of the member that are specifically identified as creditable to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program shall be treated as credits to the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account, together with interest credited at the minimum interest rate and additional earnings credit thereon. The balance of credits in a member’s account shall determine the amount to which the member is entitled under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program upon termination of employment subject to coverage by the plan. The member shall not have a right or claim to any specific assets of the account, program, plan, or retirement fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 69.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25005.

(a) Prior to July 1 of the initial plan year, and prior to the beginning of each plan year thereafter, the board shall adopt a plan amendment with respect to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program to declare the rate at which interest shall be credited to Defined Benefit Supplement accounts for the following plan year.

(b) The minimum interest rate declared annually by the board shall be in accordance with applicable federal laws and related regulations and shall not be less than the rate at which interest is credited under the Defined Benefit Program.

(c) Interest shall be credited to Defined Benefit Supplement accounts and shall be computed at the minimum interest rate on the balance of credits in a member’s account and shall be compounded daily.

(d) Credited interest shall not be applied to the balance of credits in a member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account that has been transferred to the Annuitant Reserve.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 69.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25006.

(a) The board may declare an additional earnings credit to be applied to Defined Benefit Supplement accounts for a plan year. Prior to declaring an additional earnings credit, the board shall consider all of the following:

(1) Whether the plan’s investment earnings with respect to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program for the plan year exceed the amount required to meet the liabilities identified in paragraphs (2), (3), and (4).

(2) The amount required for the plan year to credit interest on members’ nominal accounts at the minimum interest rate.

(3) The
 amount of the plan’s administrative expenses with respect to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program for the plan year.

(4) The sufficiency of the Gain and Loss Reserve and whether any additions must be made to that reserve.

(b) For any plan year that the board declares an additional earnings credit, the board shall specify the amount to be added to members’ accounts as a percentage increase. The additional earnings credit shall be applied to the balance of credits in each member’s nominal account as of the last day of the plan year and shall be applied as of the date specified by the board. The additional earnings credit shall not be added to the balance of credits transferred from a member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account to the Annuitant Reserve.

(c) The declaration of an additional earnings credit shall be
 made as a plan amendment adopted by the board with respect to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program upon recommendation of the actuary based on the actuarial valuation undertaken following the plan year pursuant to Section 22311.5, but no later than June 30 following the end of the plan year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 218, Sec. 39.   (SB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

25007.

When the board declares an additional earnings credit for a plan year, the board also may declare by plan amendment an additional annuity credit, for members and annuity beneficiaries who are receiving an annuity as of the date specified by the board pursuant to Section 25006, based on the annuity of the member and annuity beneficiaries for the plan year. The additional annuity credit shall be paid in a lump sum to the members and annuity beneficiaries on the date specified by the board. In addition to the considerations specified in Section 25006, prior to declaring an additional earnings credit, the board shall consider both of the following:

(a) The amount required for the plan year to apply the additional earnings credit to the Defined Benefit
 Supplement accounts of members who are not receiving an annuity under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program for the plan year.

(b) Any other obligations incurred by the plan with respect to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 304, Sec. 26.   (SB 634)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

25008.

A member’s right to an amount equal to the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account balance shall be vested at the time contributions are initially credited to the member’s account.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1021, Sec. 50.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25008.5.
